Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 1 Hunting, Trapping, or Fishing
27-2-18.
Permits to kill deer causing damage to crops.

The department shall be authorized to issue to a person who cultivates crops, who is immediately responsible for their cultivation, or who is the principal owner of the crops a permit to kill deer which have caused or are reasonably certain to cause damage to crops which were planted for the purpose of harvesting and marketing such crops or their by-products. The person shall apply to the department for such a permit on a form containing such information as may be necessary for the proper evaluation and consideration of the application. Permits shall be issued only in cases where the department has determined that the killing of deer is justified. Representatives of the department are authorized to investigate claims of damage and the necessity of killing deer prior to the issuance of such a permit. Permits issued by the department shall include restrictions and conditions relative to the property on which deer may be killed, persons authorized to kill deer on the property, crops which may be protected, number and sex of deer which may be killed, expiration of permit, and such other restrictions and conditions as may be necessary. It shall be unlawful for any person to kill any deer under the authority of any such permit except in accordance with the restrictions and conditions of the permit.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 645, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-321, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 20.

Cross references.

Deer generally, §

27-3-40

et seq.

27-2-19.
Wildlife importation permits.

It shall be unlawful to import any wildlife other than fish, pen raised duck, pen raised turkey, and pen raised quail without obtaining, at no cost, a wildlife importation permit from the department. The department shall only issue such a permit when it has determined that the issuance of the permit is in the best interest of the wildlife of this state. If such a permit is issued, the department shall prescribe the term for each such permit and may impose any conditions it determines necessary to ensure adequate public safety and the best interests of the wildlife of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-325, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 37; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 23; Ga. L. 1987, p. 663, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, “duck” was substituted for “ducks” near the beginning of the Code section.

27-2-20.
Federal migratory bird hunting and conservation stamp; participation in federal Migratory Bird Harvest Information Program.

It shall be unlawful for any person 16 years of age or older to hunt brant, ducks, geese, and swans in this state without a federal migratory bird hunting and conservation stamp.

It shall be unlawful for any person required to obtain a hunting license as provided in Code Section 27-2-1 to hunt any migratory game bird, including brant, ducks, geese, swans, doves, rails, woodcock, snipe, gallinules, and coots, without participating in the federal Migratory Bird Harvest Information Program. Participation in such program shall require the completion of an annual screening questionnaire prior to obtaining a Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp or a landowner Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp. Persons holding any other license conveying migratory bird hunting privileges, including a lifetime sportsman’s license, shall complete the annual screening questionnaire before hunting migratory birds. Persons shall be in possession of the license and evidence of participation in the annual screening questionnaire as provided by the department while hunting migratory birds.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-326, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 37; Ga. L. 1995, p. 946, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 8; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 10; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 10/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “It shall be unlawful for any person required to obtain a hunting license as provided in Code Section 27-2-1 to hunt any migratory game bird, including brant, ducks, geese, swans, doves, rails, woodcock, snipe, gallinules, and coots, without participating in the federal Migratory Bird Harvest Information Program. Participation in such program shall require the completion of a screening questionnaire prior to obtaining a free Georgia migratory bird license and the possession of the license or other evidence of participation while hunting migratory birds.”. See Editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Regulations governing the federal Migratory Bird program can be found at 50 C.F.R. Section 20.20.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-20.1.
Required participation in Saltwater Information Program.

It shall be unlawful for any person required to obtain a fishing license as provided in Code Section 27-2-1 to fish in the salt waters of this state without participating in the Saltwater Information Program. Participation in such program shall require the completion of a screening questionnaire prior to obtaining a free Georgia salt water fishing endorsement and the possession of such endorsement or other evidence of participation while salt water fishing.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-20.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 2/HB 869.

27-2-21.
Field and retriever trials; permits; hunting licenses.

It shall be unlawful for any person to conduct a field or retriever trial without first obtaining a permit, at no cost, from the department. In trials conducted with such a permit, the species of wildlife specified on the permit may be set or pursued by dogs, but such wildlife may not be taken except during the open season for such species of wildlife. The person conducting such a field trial shall require all participants therein to register.

It shall be unlawful for any person to participate in a field or retriever trial unless a permit for such trial has been issued by the department and unless the person is registered as a participant in the trial.

All persons participating in a field or retriever trial will be required to have an appropriate resident hunting license or nonresident hunting/fishing license unless the field or retriever trial is recognized by a nationally registered field trialing organization or unless the field or retriever trial is conducted by a local field trialing organization based in the State of Georgia which is recognized by the department as being qualified to conduct such trial.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, properly marked pen raised mallard ducks and properly marked pen raised quail may be killed by any person registered as a participant in a permitted field trial.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-327, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 37; Ga. L. 1984, p. 537, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 842, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 231, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 7/HB 326.

27-2-22.
Wildlife rehabilitation permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person to keep, hold, or possess in captivity any sick or injured wildlife, except fish, without first obtaining, at no charge, a wildlife rehabilitation permit from the department; provided, however, that such permit shall only be issued to persons determined by the department, based on criteria established by regulation of the board, to be competent and capable of rehabilitating the wildlife for which a permit has been requested; provided, further, that the department shall only issue such a permit when it has determined that the issuance of the permit is in the best interest of the wildlife of this state. If such a permit is issued, the department shall prescribe the term for each such permit and may impose any conditions it determines necessary to ensure adequate public safety and to be in the best interests of the wildlife of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-328, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 24; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27.

27-2-22.1.
Fox trapping and selling.

It shall be unlawful for any person to trap and sell live fox without first procuring a commercial trapping license provided for in Code Section 27-2-23. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, live fox may be taken from the wild only during trapping season and may be sold only to licensed commercial fox hunting preserves or licensed commercial fox breeders. Foxes may be held during open trapping season for up to five days until sold but must be sold or dispatched within five days after the close of trapping season. Any person in possession of a live fox must comply with the provisions of Code Section 27-5-6.

It shall be unlawful for any person to purchase a live fox unless the person selling such game animal has a valid commercial trapping license and unless the person purchasing such animal has a valid license provided for in this Code section.

It shall be unlawful for any person to own or operate an area utilized for the purpose of running, taking, or hunting penned fox for a fee or other manner of compensation to such owner or operator unless such person has a valid commercial fox hunting preserve license provided for in this subsection and in Code Section 27-2-23. For purposes of this Code section, the term “penned fox” means a fox that has been trapped, purchased, or raised in captivity. The license required by this subsection shall be effective from April 1 through March 31 of the following year. An application for a commercial fox hunting preserve license shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the department. No license shall be issued pursuant to this subsection unless the following conditions are met and each permit shall be conditioned upon the following:

Fox may be held in holding pens not less than four acres in size or in smaller facilities for the treatment of fox which are injured, diseased, or very young;

There shall be no restriction on the number of dogs which may be used concurrently in areas of at least 100 acres in size which are enclosed and used for the purpose of running, taking, or hunting penned fox. For enclosed areas of less than 100 acres only one dog may be used for each five acres of area to be utilized for running, taking, or hunting penned fox;

The density of fox in a running pen may not exceed one animal per ten acres;

The boundary lines of areas to be utilized for the purpose of running, taking, or hunting penned fox must be posted against trespassing and must be marked by signs indicating such boundary lines, and letters not less than two inches in height shall be used to indicate such boundary lines and that the area is posted against trespassing;

All facilities to be utilized by the fox hunting preserve shall be maintained in a sanitary condition with adequate food, water, and shelter available at all times for such animals. Fox shall also be vaccinated against canine disease prior to release into an area used for running, taking, or hunting; and

Records of fox located within the fox hunting preserve and of any known losses of fox shall be maintained and kept current by the owner or operator of such facility. Records shall also be maintained of all fox purchased, including the number of fox purchased, the date of purchase, and the name and address of the seller, for the purpose of inspection by the department.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of propagating or breeding fox for sale, restocking, propagation, or other commercial purposes unless that person has obtained a commercial fox breeder license provided for in this subsection and in Code Section 27-2-23. Such license shall be effective from April 1 through March 31 of the following year. An application for a commercial fox breeder license shall be submitted on a form as prescribed by the department. No license shall be issued pursuant to this subsection unless the following conditions are met and each permit shall be conditioned upon the following:

All facilities associated with the business of propagating or breeding fox shall be maintained in a sanitary condition with adequate food, water, and shelter available at all times for such animals;

Records shall be kept of fox purchased by the commercial fox breeder, including the number of animals, the date of purchase, and the name and address of the seller, for the purpose of inspection by the department; and

Persons engaged in the business of propagating or breeding fox shall be knowledgeable and competent in such business.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt, take, or possess fox at a commercial fox hunting preserve without first procuring the licenses required under this title; provided, however, nonresidents of this state may procure a nonresident hunting preserve license which shall meet the requirements of this subsection and this title.

It shall be unlawful to receive or possess any fox shipped, transported, or removed from outside of this state unless the jurisdiction from which such fox was transported is pursuant to a permit from the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-22.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 469, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2863, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27.

27-2-23.
License, permit, tag, and stamp fees.

Fees for licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by this title shall be as follows:

Hunting licenses: (A) Resident hunting license Annual $ 15.00 (B) Nonresident hunting license Annual 100.00 (C) Nonresident hunting license One-day 20.00 (D) Resident big game license Annual 25.00 (E) Nonresident big game license Annual 225.00 (F) Resident big game license One-day 10.00 (G) Nonresident big game license One-day 130.00 (H) Resident senior hunting license for 65 years of age or older Annual 4.00 (I) Shooting preserve hunting license valid for residents and nonresidents Two-year 12.00 (J) Commercial fox hunting preserve license Seasonal 75.00 (K) Commercial fox breeder license Seasonal 75.00 (L) Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp valid for residents and nonresidents Annual 5.00 (M) Landowner Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp Annual 0.00 (2) Hunting and fishing licenses: (A) Resident hunting/fishing license Annual 30.00 (B) Nonresident hunting/fishing license One-day 30.00 (C) Resident hunting/fishing license One-day 5.00 (D) Nonresident hunting/fishing license Annual 150.00 (3) Sportsman’s licenses: (A) Resident sportsman’s license Annual 65.00 (B) Nonresident sportsman’s license Annual 400.00 (C) Resident sportsman’s license One-day 25.00 (D) Nonresident sportsman’s license One-day 170.00 (E) Resident optional youth sportsman’s license for 12 to 15 years of age Annual 5.00 (F) Resident optional youth sportsman’s license for 12 to 15 years of age Multiyear 15.00 (G) Resident senior sportsman’s license for 65 years of age or older Annual 7.00 (H) Nonresident youth sportsman’s license for 15 years of age and under Annual $50.00 (4) Recreational fishing licenses: (A) Resident fishing license Annual 15.00 (B) Nonresident fishing license Annual 50.00 (C) Nonresident fishing license One-day 10.00 (D) Resident trout license Annual 10.00 (E) Resident trout license One-day 5.00 (F) Nonresident trout license Annual 25.00 (G) Nonresident trout license One-day 10.00 (H) Resident optional youth fishing license Annual 3.00 (I) Resident optional youth fishing license Multiyear 10.00 (J) Resident senior fishing license for 65 years of age or older Annual 4.00 (5) Trapping licenses: (A) Resident commercial trapping license Annual 40.00 (B) Nonresident commercial trapping license Annual 325.00 (6) Commercial fishing licenses: (A) Resident commercial fishing license Seasonal 20.00 (B) Nonresident commercial fishing license Seasonal 200.00 (C) Resident commercial fishing species endorsement Seasonal 5.00 (D) Nonresident commercial fishing species endorsement Seasonal 10.00 (E) Resident commercial crabbing license Seasonal 20.00 (F) Nonresident commercial crabbing license Seasonal 200.00 (7) Fur, hide, and pelt licenses: (A) Resident fur dealer license Annual 300.00 (B) Nonresident fur dealer license Annual 450.00 (C) Fur dealer’s agent license Annual 200.00 (8) Miscellaneous licenses and permits: (A) Retail fish dealer license Annual 40.00 (B) Wholesale fish dealer license Annual 75.00 (C) Resident game-holding permit Annual 5.00 (D) Commercial quail breeder permit Annual 30.00 (E) Scientific collecting permit Annual 75.00 (F) Wildlife exhibition permit Annual 150.00 (G) Commercial shooting preserve license Annual 150.00 (H) Private shooting preserve license Annual 50.00 (I) Reserved. (J) Commercial fish hatchery license Annual 75.00 (K) Catch-out pond license Annual 250.00 (L) Soft-shell crab dealer license Annual 40.00 (M) Resident taxidermist license Three-year 150.00 (N) Nonresident taxidermist license Three-year 500.00 (O) Falconry permit Three-year 40.00 (P) Commercial alligator farming license Annual 75.00 (Q) Resident alligator harvest permit Annual 75.00 (R) Nonresident alligator harvest permit Annual 250.00 (S) Wild animal license Annual 250.00 (T) Wild animal auction license Seven-day 5,500.00 (U) Resident bait dealer license Seasonal 40.00 (V) Nonresident bait dealer license Seasonal 250.00 (W) Resident film production wildlife permit Annual 300.00 (X) Nonresident film production wildlife permit Annual 600.00 (Y) Resident trawler crew license Annual 200.00 (Z) Nonresident trawler crew license Annual 600.00 (AA) Seafood dealer license Annual 40.00

Click to view

Nonresident hunting license: $6.00 per day; (B) Resident big game license: $2.00 per day; (C) Nonresident big game license: $8.00 per day; (D) Nonresident hunting/fishing license: $10.00 per day; (E) Resident hunting/fishing license: $1.00 per day; (F) Nonresident fishing license: $3.50 per day; (G) Resident trout license: $1.00 per day; (H) Nonresident trout license: $2.00 per day; (I) Resident sportsman’s license: $3.00 per day; and (J) Nonresident sportsman’s license: $20.00 per day.

Click to view

(9)

Any one-day license purchased that has not expired may be extended for up to ten additional consecutive days by payment of additional reduced rate daily fees:

(10)

The board is authorized to provide by rule for a fee not to exceed $19.00 for resident daily, seasonal, or annual use permits, or licenses; a fee of $38.00 for resident two-year use permits; or a fee not to exceed $73.00 for nonresident annual use permits or licenses to hunt and fish on or otherwise use specially designated streams, lakes, public fishing areas, or wildlife management areas.

(11)

For wildlife that may be legally taken by commercial fishing gear as authorized in this title or by board rule, the board may designate which species of wildlife or species grouping of wildlife require a commercial fishing species endorsement for a fee shown in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (6) of this Code section in addition to the required commercial fishing license. Each species or group of species so designated shall require a separate commercial fishing species endorsement.

(12)

The fees for any annual license established in subparagraphs (A) through (E) of paragraph (1) and in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of this Code section shall be reduced by the amount of the lowest available renewal transaction fee for each renewal transaction made before the expiration date of the then current license or tag. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “renewal transaction” means the renewal of one or more licenses by a licensee during a single telephone call, Internet session, or on-site visit to a store.

(13)

After July 1, 2017, the General Assembly shall not increase the cost of any license, permit, tag, or stamp provided for in this Code section by more than 20 percent.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 114, § 2; Ga. L. 1924, p. 101, § 36; Ga. L. 1925, p. 302, § 13; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Ga. L. 1931, p. 173, § 6; Code 1933, §§ 45-206, 45-207, 45-213, 45-304; Ga. L. 1935, p. 379, § 2; Ga. L. 1935, p. 386, § 5; Ga. L. 1937, p. 675, § 2; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 332, § 5; Ga. L. 1939, p. 316, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 315, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1005, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1116, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1188, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1189, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1577, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 157, §§ 8-9a; Ga. L. 1952, p. 258, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 521, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 173, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 158, §§ 1, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, §§ 30, 31; Ga. L. 1959, p. 184, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 974, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 6, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 634, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 480, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 9; Ga. L. 1971, p. 38, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 915, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 274, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1254, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 771, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1159, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1674, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-303, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1270, § 6; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 23, 24; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1552, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 420, §§ 4-7; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 19; Ga. L. 1979, p. 800, § 5; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1094, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 144, §§ 4-6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 823, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, §§ 5-7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 467, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 837, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 913, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1047, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 179, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 469, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 663, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 27; Ga. L. 1989, p. 506, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 386, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 2422, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 470, §§ 1, 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 946, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 7A; Ga. L. 2005, p. 517, § 1/HB 662; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 8/HB 326; Ga. L. 2012, p. 958, § 1A/SB 464; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 5/HB 155; Ga. L. 2016, p. 432, § 5/HB 840; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 11/HB 208; Ga. L. 2018, p. 948, § 3/SB 332; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 27/SB 52; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 27/SB 429.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added subparagraphs (8)(W) and (8)(X). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s note for applicability.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subparagraph (3)(H).

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted the dollar sign preceding “50.00” in subparagraph (3)(H).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “years of age or younger” for “years of age and under” in subparagraph (3)(H).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a second, repetitive “preserve” was deleted from the version of subparagraph (7)(H) (now subparagraph (8)(H)).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 179, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, set forth the legislative intent of that Act.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 470, §§ 4 and 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly declares its intent to use the increases and changes in fees provided in this Act to fund the acquisition and management of lands and waters, by and through the Department of Natural Resources, for fish hatcheries; for wildlife restoration, propagation, protection, preservation, research, or management; for public hunting, fishing, or trapping; and for related recreational areas. The General Assembly further recognizes the importance of wildlife related recreation and the need to provide greater opportunities for such recreation and public lands in the face of rapid woodland development and appropriation of existing wildlife habitat. The General Assembly further declares its intent to ensure that the funding provided by hunters and fishermen through the payment of these license fee increases and changes will fund the acquisition of fish and wildlife habitat and public recreational areas.

“This Act shall become effective on April 1, 1992, or as soon thereafter as it is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval; provided, however, that the fees which are increased in Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall on March 31, 2012, be reduced to the level of such fees prior to the effective date of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, §§ 10, 11, and 12/HB 326 eliminated the automatic reduction of rates provided by Ga. L. 1992, p. 470, § 5.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 432, § 6/HB 840, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2016, and shall apply to all offenses occurring on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-23.1.
Raccoon fur seller’s license.

In addition to the fur dealers’ licenses provided for in Code Section 27-2-23, the department shall issue a raccoon fur seller’s license for an annual fee of $5.00. A person to whom a raccoon fur seller’s license has been issued shall be authorized to sell the raw, undressed furs, hides, skins, or pelts of raccoons lawfully taken by any means other than by trapping.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell the raw, undressed fur, hide, skin, or pelt of a raccoon lawfully taken by means other than trapping unless such person has a current valid raccoon fur seller’s license issued by the department. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A person who purchases or sells raw, undressed furs, hides, skins, or pelts of raccoons taken by trapping and by means other than trapping shall be considered a fur dealer within the meaning of this Code section and must be licensed therefor as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. The license authorized by this Code section shall be issued only to persons who take raccoons exclusively by lawful means other than trapping.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1006, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 194, § 1.

27-2-23.2.
Salt water fishing guide licenses; fees; reporting requirements.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the occupation of salt water fishing guide without holding a valid annual salt water fishing guide license pursuant to the provisions of this Code section.

A salt water fishing guide who possesses a valid United States Coast Guard operator of passenger vessel license may purchase an annual customer fishing license pursuant to the provisions of this Code section, which license shall cover all fee-paying anglers while fishing with such guide during the license year; and all such anglers while so covered shall be exempt from fishing license requirements otherwise applicable under this title.

Any person operating a single hotel or motel facility having a salt water fishing pier or piers may purchase an annual salt water fishing pier license pursuant to the provisions of this Code section, which license shall cover all anglers while fishing from such salt water fishing pier during the license year; and all such anglers while so covered shall be exempt from fishing license requirements otherwise applicable under this title.

Fees for licenses required under this Code section shall be as follows:

Resident salt water fishing guide license, $25.00;

Nonresident salt water fishing guide license, $50.00;

Customer fishing license for a resident salt water fishing guide carrying six or fewer fee-paying anglers, $150.00;

Customer fishing license for a resident salt water fishing guide carrying an unlimited number of fee-paying anglers, $400.00;

Customer fishing license for a nonresident salt water fishing guide, $400.00; and

Salt water fishing pier license, $400.00.

Each person who holds a salt water fishing guide license or salt water fishing pier license pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall report such information as required by the department at such times and in such manner as the board provides by rule or regulation.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-23.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 10; Ga. L. 2007, p. 91, § 2/HB 81.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, subsections (b) and (c), as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 10, were redesignated as subsections (c) and (d), respectively.

27-2-24.
Service of process for licensees, permittees, and applicants.

All applications to the department for any license or permit, or license and permit, provided by this title shall designate an address in Georgia where the applicant can be personally served with legal process, or shall contain an appointment of an agent in Georgia for acceptance of service of legal process together with the agent’s Georgia address, or shall contain a designation of the Secretary of State of Georgia for acceptance of service of legal process. A copy of any application so designating the Secretary of State shall be forwarded by the department to the Secretary of State. The filing of an application with the department for a license or permit, or both, shall constitute an admission by the applicant that the applicant is doing business in Georgia.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-322, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-2-25.
Revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal of license or permits; administrative and judicial review.

Upon a determination by the commissioner that a person has violated this title or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, the commissioner may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any license or permit, or both, required by this title which is held by or has been applied for by the person, for a period of up to two years following the determination of such violation, provided that the license or permit, or both, to be revoked, suspended, denied, or not renewed must not be unrelated to the violation determined by the commissioner. The licensee, permit holder, or applicant for a license or permit, or both, shall be notified of the proposed revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the license or permit, or both, or to the Secretary of State as provided in Code Section 27-2-24. The proposed revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this Code section.

In the event any person who is an employee, agent, or representative of a licensee, permittee, or applicant for a license or permit, or both, engages in the licensed or permitted activity pursuant to the authority of the license or permit of such licensee, permittee, or applicant for a license or permit, or both, and violates this title or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, the commissioner may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew a license or permit in accordance with this Code section.

Any person whose license, permit, or application for a license or permit, or both, is proposed for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall, upon petition within 30 days of issuance of notice given as stated in subsection (a) of this Code section, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the commissioner, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-323, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 36; Ga. L. 1984, p. 404, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 27; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to subsection (a) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

27-2-25.1.
Suspension of hunting privileges for negligent hunting; procedures following hunting accidents.

The General Assembly has heretofore found and declared that hunting is a privilege to be exercised only in accordance with the law granting such privilege. The General Assembly now specifically finds and declares that while the act of hunting is an enjoyable and beneficial form of recreation, it can be dangerous not only to the hunter himself but also to other persons if due care is not exercised. Therefore, the General Assembly declares that all persons who refuse or fail to exercise such due care may have their hunting privileges suspended as provided in this Code section.

Any person engaged in the act of hunting who by the use of a weapon kills or injures another person or persons, whether or not such other person or persons are likewise engaged in the act of hunting, shall notify the department or any appropriate law enforcement officer who shall then notify the department immediately after such occurrence. Any person who fails so to notify the department or such law enforcement officer shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon notification of such a death or injury, whether by the hunter or by some other person, the department shall immediately initiate an investigation of such incident and submit a report to the commissioner. If the commissioner determines culpable negligence on the part of the person causing the death or injury and that such negligence was the proximate cause of such death or injury, the commissioner may suspend that person’s hunting privileges for a specified period of time not to exceed ten years. Any such determination to suspend shall be subject to review as provided for in this Code section. When the commissioner shall decide to suspend said person’s hunting privileges, the commissioner must notify such person of said suspension and of his right to a hearing to contest the commissioner’s determination. The notification from the commissioner to the person whose license is being suspended shall be by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested; or, in lieu thereof, notice may be given by personal service upon such person. Upon such notice, any such hunting privileges shall be revoked by such notice and such person shall surrender his or her hunting license, if any, to the department within ten days of such notification. For the purposes of this article, notice given by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested mailed to the person’s last known address shall be prima-facie evidence that such person received the required notice.

The person so notified may request an administrative hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board within 30 days of receipt of the notice. If no hearing is requested within the 30 day period, the right to a hearing shall have been waived and the hunting privileges of the person shall stand suspended as prescribed by the commissioner’s notice. If, following the administrative hearing, there is a determination that such person was negligent and that such negligence was the proximate cause of the death or injury, the hunting privileges of such person may be suspended for a period of up to ten years. The period of time that such privileges are suspended shall be commensurate with the degree of negligence and the severity of the injury. If there is a determination of no negligence or that the negligence was not the proximate cause of the death or injury, the person’s hunting privileges shall be restored. The provisions of Code Section 27-2-27 shall not be applicable to a suspension under this Code section.

Any person whose hunting privileges have been suspended under this Code section and who engages in the act of hunting during such period of suspension shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished by a fine of not more than $5,000.00 or by imprisonment for not more than 12 months, or both. Any person whose hunting privileges have been suspended under this Code section shall complete a course of instruction in competency and safety in hunting and in the handling of weapons provided for in Code Section 27-2-5 prior to any subsequent exercise of his hunting privileges.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“License” means any and all licenses, permits, or stamps as required by law for hunting in this state.

“Hunting privileges” means the exercise of the privilege of hunting whether such privilege is bestowed by license or otherwise.

“Suspend” means the suspension or revocation of any existing license or hunting privileges and the suspension or revocation of the privilege of obtaining any new license or hunting privileges.

The hearing before an administrative law judge and any judicial review shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50 and applicable rules and regulations of the board.

The proceedings provided for by this Code section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any civil or criminal action or actions provided for by law and the final decision of this proceeding shall not constitute res judicata as to any such civil or criminal action or actions and shall not be admissible as evidence in any such civil or criminal action or actions.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 549, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 27; Ga. L. 1985, p. 894, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1179, § 2.

Cross references.

Homicide generally, §

16-5-1

et seq.

Wrongful death, § 51-4-1 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to subsection (c) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

27-2-25.2.
Power to suspend licenses.

The commissioner shall have the power to suspend any license required by this title when such license holder is not in compliance with a court order for child support as provided in Code Section 19-6-28.1. The commissioner shall also have the power to deny the application for issuance or renewal of a license required by this title when such applicant is not in compliance with a court order for child support as provided in Code Section 19-6-28.1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 27-2-25, the hearings and appeal procedures provided for in Code Section 19-6-28.1 shall be the only such procedures required to suspend or deny any license pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-25.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1613, § 34.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 enactment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1997).

27-2-26.
Rules and regulations regarding revocation or cancellation procedures; surrender of license, stamp, or permit after revocation or cancellation.

The board is authorized to provide by rule or regulation the procedure whereby the department may, pursuant to Code Section 27-2-25, revoke or cancel any license, certificate, stamp, card, or permit upon determination that the holder thereof was not entitled to issuance or obtained the license, certificate, stamp, card, or permit by any fraudulent means. Upon revocation or cancellation, the holder thereof shall surrender the license, certificate, stamp, card, or permit to the department.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-302.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 2264, § 1.